Utah statutes.
48-2e-812.   Judicial review of denial of reinstatement.

(1)  If the division denies a limited partnership's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the division shall serve the limited partnership with notice in a record that explains the reasons for the denial.

(2)  A limited partnership may seek judicial review of denial of reinstatement in the district court not later than 30 days after service of the notice of denial.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

